Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3307
Contempt; penalty.

The penalty for contempt of court, as provided in sections 29-3301 to 29-3307, shall not exceed thirty days' imprisonment in the county jail.

Laws 1971, LB 568, § 7.

The identifying physical characteristics statutes require a showing of probable cause to believe the person seized has engaged in an articulable criminal offense before the judicial officer can issue an order to produce identifying physical characteristics. State v. Marcus, 265 Neb. 910, 660 N.W.2d 837 (2003).

When determining whether an order to produce identifying physical characteristics was based on a showing of probable cause, a court considers the totality of the circumstances. State v. Marcus, 265 Neb. 910, 660 N.W.2d 837 (2003).

Sections 29-3301 to 29-3307 do not violate privilege against self-incrimination, are constitutional, and apply to physical evidence, not to oral communications or testimony. State v. Swayze, 197 Neb. 149, 247 N.W.2d 440 (1976).